zh-TW: 蛋類來源動物: 雞; 鴨; 鴯鶓; 鵝; 珠雞; 鴕鳥; 雉雞; 鵪鶉; 火雞; 其他
pt-BR: O animal que fornece os ovos: Galinha; Pato; Emu; Ganso; Galinha-d'angola; Avestruz; Faisão; Codorna; Peru; Outro
ko: 산란 동물: 닭; 오리; 에뮤; 거위; 뿔닭; 타조; 꿩; 메추라기; 칠면조; 기타
ro-RO: Animalul de origine al ouălor: Găină; Rață; Emu; Gâscă; Bibilică; Struț; Fazan; Prepeliță; Curcan; Altele
tr: Yumurtaları üreten hayvan: Tavuk; Ördek; Emu; Kaz; Beç tavuğu; Deve kuşu; Sülün; Bıldırcın; Hindi; Diğer
de: Tierische Quelle der Eier: Huhn; Ente; Emu; Gans; Perlhuhn; Strauß; Fasan; Wachtel; Pute; Sonstige
pt-PT: O animal que fornece os ovos: Galinha; Pato; Emu; Ganso; Galinha-d'angola; Avestruz; Faisão; Codorniz; Peru; Outro
zh-CN: 蛋源动物: 鸡; 鸭; 鸸鹋; 鹅; 珍珠鸡; 鸵鸟; 野鸡; 鹌鹑; 火鸡; 其他
el: Ζώο προέλευσης αυγού: Κοτόπουλο; Πάπια; Εμού; Χήνα; Φραγκόκοτα; Στρουθοκάμηλος; Φασιανός; Ορτύκι; Γαλοπούλα; Άλλο
da: Dyr, der leverer æg: Høne; And; Emu; Gås; Perlehøne; Struds; Fasan; Vagtel; Kalkun; Andet
lt-LT: Kiaušinių kilmės gyvūnas: Višta; Antis; Emu; Žąsis; Pataluška; Strutis; Fazanas; Putpelė; Kalakutas; Kita
cs: Živočišný zdroj vajec: Slepice; Kachna; Emu; Husa; Perlička; Pštros; Bažant; Křepelka; Krůta; Jiné
vi: Động vật cung cấp trứng: Gà; Vịt; Đà điểu Emu; Ngỗng; Gà sao; Đà điểu; Trĩ; Cút; Gà tây; Khác
nl: Ei herkomstdier: Kip; Eend; Emoe; Gans; Parelhoen; Struisvogel; Fazant; Kwartel; Kalkoen; Overige
fr: Espèce d’origine des œufs: Poulet; Canard; Émeu; Oie; Pintade; Autruche; Faisan; Caille; Dinde; Autre
sk-SK: Zviera, z ktorého pochádzajú vajcia: Sliepka; Kačica; Emu; Hus; Perlička; Pštros; Bažant; Prepelica; Morka; Iné
fi: Munan alkuperäeläin: Kana; Ankka; Emu; Hanhi; Helmikana; Strutsi; Fasaani; Viiriäinen; Kalkkuna; Muu
nb: Eggkildedyr: Høne; And; Emu; Gås; Perlehøne; Struts; Fasan; Vaktel; Kalkun; Annet
pl: Zwierzę będące źródłem jaj: Kura; Kaczka; Emu; Gęś; Perliczka; Struś; Bażant; Przepiórka; Indyk; Inne
bg-BG: Животно, източник на яйца: Кокошка; Патица; Ему; Гъска; Токачка; Щраус; Фазан; Пъдпъдък; Пуйка; Друго
hr-HR: Životinja koja je izvor jaja: Kokoš; Patka; Emu; Guska; Biserka; Noj; Fazan; Prepelica; Pura; Ostalo
th: ประเภทของสัตว์ที่ให้ไข่: ไก่; เป็ด; นกอีมู; ห่าน; ไก่ต๊อก; นกกระจอกเทศ; ไก่ฟ้า; นกกระทา; ไก่งวง; อื่นๆ
en: Egg source animal: Chicken; Duck; Emu; Goose; Guinea fowl; Ostrich; Pheasant; Quail; Turkey; Other
sv: Äggkällans djur: Höna; Anka; Emu; Gås; Pärlhöna; Struts; Fasan; Vaktel; Kalkon; Övrigt
es: Animal productor de los huevos: Gallina; Pato; Emú; Ganso; Gallina de Guinea; Avestruz; Faisán; Codorniz; Pavo; Otro
it: fonte di uova animale: Gallina; Anatra; Emù; Oca; Faraona; Struzzo; Fagiano; Quaglia; Tacchino; Altro
sl-SI: Živalski vir jajc: Kokoš; Raca; Emu; Gos; Pegatka; Noj; Fazan; Prepelica; Puran; Drugo
hu: A tojást adó állat: Tyúk; Kacsa; Emu; Liba; Gyöngytyúk; Strucc; Fácán; Fürj; Pulyka; Egyéb
ru: Животное-источник яиц: Курица; Утка; Эму; Гусь; Цесарка; Страус; Фазан; Перепел; Индейка; Другое
ja: 卵の供給源となる動物: 鶏; アヒル; エミュー; ガチョウ; ホロホロ鳥; ダチョウ; キジ; ウズラ; 七面鳥; その他